California, session 20252026, AB2267.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 92.7 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:92.7. (a) (1) Beginning on or before July 1, 2028, the The department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health and in collaboration with impacted local governments, comply with both of the following:(A) Incorporate Beginning on or before July 1, 2028, incorporate suicide deterrent considerations in the updates of applicable guidance documents.(B) Develop Beginning on or before July 1, 2029, develop and maintain a set of preapproved suicide prevention safety-barrier designs that local governments may use to install suicide prevention barriers.(2) Suicide deterrent considerations shall include, but not be limited to, the evaluation and adoption of guidance for countermeasures that may deter suicide attempts on bridges and overpasses on the state highway system, including the design, placement, and modification of barriers, fencing, and other infrastructure.(3) A suicide deterrent consideration incorporated into guidance documents pursuant to this subdivision shall be as determined by the department to be appropriate.(b) This section does not impose a mandatory duty pursuant to Section 815.6 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________